test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-J-Ж_Д-семья_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - семья M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: семья́
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: семью́
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: семьи́
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: семье́
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: семье́
      семья+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: семьёй
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: се́мьи
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: се́мьи
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: семе́й
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: се́мьях
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: се́мьям
      семья+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: се́мьями
